Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1189.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1301.19 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, amended July 17, 2024 (P.L.910, No.81), is amended to read:Section 1301.19. Claim for Property Paid or Delivered.--(a) Any person claiming an interest in any property paid or delivered to the Commonwealth under this article may file a claim thereto or to the proceeds from the sale thereof on the form prescribed by the State Treasurer.(b) Regardless of whether a claim is filed under subsection (a), the State Treasurer may pay or deliver any property paid or delivered to the Commonwealth under this article, or the proceeds from the sale of the property, to a person if the State Treasurer finds that a report filed under section 1301.11 identifies the person as the sole owner of the property and the value of the property or proceeds is less than [five hundred dollars ($500)] ten thousand dollars ($10,000).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 2. SECTION 1724-H OF THE ACT IS REPEALED:[SECTION 1724-H. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION.FROM FEDERAL MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR IRA - SOLAR FOR ALL, NO MONEY SHALL BE ENCUMBERED, COMMITTED OR EXPENDED UNLESS AUTHORIZED BY STATE LAW ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.]SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 1301.19 OF THE ACT SHALL 20250HB1189PN1870 - 2 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.(2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250HB1189PN1870 - 3 - 123